Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1925
Failure to pay; penalty; waiver;
when; withholding authorized; collection methods authorized.

(1) A nursing facility
or skilled nursing facility that fails to pay the quality assurance assessment
within the timeframe specified in section 68-1921 or 68-1924, whichever is
applicable, shall pay, in addition to the outstanding quality assurance assessment,
a penalty of one and one-half percent of the quality assurance assessment
amount owed for each month or portion of a month that the assessment is overdue.
If the department determines that good cause is shown for failure to pay the
quality assurance assessment, the department shall waive the penalty or a
portion of the penalty.

(2) If a quality
assurance assessment has not been received by the department within thirty
days following the quarter for which the assessment is due, the department
shall withhold an amount equal to the quality assurance assessment and penalty
owed from any payment due such nursing facility or skilled nursing facility
under the medical assistance program.

(3) The quality assurance assessment shall
constitute a debt due the state and may be collected by civil action, including,
but not limited to, the filing of tax liens, and any other method provided
for by law.

(4) The department shall remit any penalty collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 25.